Utah statutes.
32B-1-203.   Licensee compliance with other laws.

(1)  A licensee and a person applying for a license shall comply with the applicable federal and state laws pertaining to payment of taxes and contributions to unemployment and insurance funds to which the licensee or person may be subject.

(2)  The commission:

(a)  may not issue a license to a person who violates this section; and

(b)  may suspend, revoke, or not renew the license of a licensee who violates this section.



Amended by Chapter 307, 2011 General Session

